Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB33.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 222.504 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The cabinet shall:
(a) Require certified recovery residences to provide proof of certification at least
annually;
(b) Require certified recovery residences to notify the cabinet of any change in
their certification status, including but not limited to a suspension or
revocation of certification by a certifying organization;
(c) Require separate proof of certification for each recovery residence owned or
operated by an individual or entity in the Commonwealth;
(d) Post on its website the name, telephone number, and location by local
jurisdiction of each certified recovery residence and shall update the list at
least quarterly;
(e) Post on its website the name of each certifying organization approved by the
cabinet;[ and]
(f) Notify local governments with appropriate jurisdiction:
1. Within thirty (30) days of receipt of:
a. Proof from a recovery residence that it has initiated a
certification process with a certifying organization in accordance
with KRS 222.502(2)(b); and
b. Proof of certification from a recovery residence;
2. Of any civil fines imposed by the cabinet on a recovery residence
within thirty (30) days of the action taken; and
3. Upon receipt, of contact information for each recovery residence,
including the:
a. Name and phone number of the owner;
Page 1 of 3
BR039400.100 - 394 - XXXX 2/27/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 394
b. Name, phone number, and email address of the primary contact;
and
c. Name, phone number, and address of the residence; and
(g) Consider the information in paragraph (f) of this subsection to be a public
record under KRS 61.870 to 61.884 and open to public inspection during all
normal business hours and times[ of receipt of proof of certification from a
recovery residence within thirty (30) days of receipt of proof of certification].
(2) [The cabinet shall not disclose the address of a recovery residence except to local
governments, local law enforcement, and emergency personnel.
(3) ]The cabinet may:
(a) In lieu of posting the information required by subsection (1)(d) of this section
to its website, post a link to another website that aggregates information on
certified recovery residences or other information providers; and
(b) Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A
to carry out the provisions of this section and KRS 222.500, 222.502,
222.506, 222.508, and 222.510.
(3)[(4)] If a recovery residence violates any provision of this section, KRS 222.502, or
any administrative regulation promulgated thereunder, the cabinet and local
governments are hereby granted the authority and legal standing necessary to
impose civil fines as permitted under subsection (4)[(5)] of this section and to
initiate appropriate legal action to compel a recovery residence that is operating in
violation of KRS 222.502 to cease operating.
(4)[(5)] (a) Any certified recovery residence or other person operating a recovery
residence who knowingly fails to submit any report, data, or other information
as may be required by the cabinet through the promulgation of an
administrative regulation or by a local government through the enactment of a
local ordinance or who submits fraudulent reports, data, or information may
Page 2 of 3
BR039400.100 - 394 - XXXX 2/27/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 394
be subject to civil fines established by the cabinet through the promulgation of
an administrative regulation or by a local government through the enactment
of a local ordinance.
(b) Any person or entity who knowingly establishes, maintains, or operates an
uncertified recovery residence in violation of KRS 222.502 may be subject to
civil fines established by the cabinet through the promulgation of an
administrative regulation or by a local government through the enactment of a
local ordinance.
(5)[(6)] Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a recovery residence that furnishes
proof of current certification from a certifying organization to a local government
shall be presumed by the local government to be in compliance with this section
and KRS 222.500, 222.502, 222.506, 222.508, and 222.510.
Section 2. KRS 222.510 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Nothing in KRS 222.500 to 222.510 shall be interpreted or construed to alter,
amend, or otherwise infringe upon a local government's authority to regulate the use
of property through properly enacted land use laws pursuant to KRS Chapter 100,
rental property regulations, or any other local government authority provided under
the law.
(2) Local governments with appropriate jurisdiction may maintain a registry of
recovery residences, including the information listed in subsection (1)(f) of
Section 1 of this Act. The registry shall be considered a public record under KRS
61.870 to 61.884 and open to public inspection during all normal business hours
and times.
Page 3 of 3
BR039400.100 - 394 - XXXX 2/27/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed